Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 352 Mining Regulations
352.500.
Rights of adjoining owners.

Each owner, tenant or occupant of land on which a mine is opened and worked, or his superintendent, shall permit any person interested in or having title to any land adjoining the mined property to have ingress and egress with surveyors and assistants to explore and survey the mine at his own expense once a month for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not KRS

352.490

has been violated.

If the right granted in subsection (1) is refused, complaint may be made before the District Court of the county in which the mine is located, and the court shall issue a summons to the owner, tenant, occupant or superintendent to answer the complaint. On the return of the summons executed, and proof that the complainant has right of entry and has been refused without sufficient cause, the court shall designate an early and convenient time for the entry to be made, and issue an order commanding the sheriff of the county to attend and prevent obstructions and impediments to the entry, exploration and survey. The cost of summons and the fee of the sheriff shall be paid by the person whose refusal occasioned the complaint, unless the court dismisses the complaint, in which case the party making the complaint shall pay the cost and sheriff’s fee. Either party may appeal as in other actions.

History.

2739-52: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 45; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 281.

352.510.
Mining near oil or gas wells — Hearing.

In any underground mine before removing any coal or other material or driving any entry or passageway within three hundred (300) feet of any surveyed natural gas or petroleum well, or before extending the workings in any mine beneath any tract of land on which these wells are also drilled, or within three hundred (300) feet of any of these wells or under any tract of land in visible possession of a well operator, the operator shall forward simultaneously to the well operator and to the Department for Natural Resources, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by registered mail, a copy of the maps and plans required by law to be filed and kept up to date, showing on the copy of the map or plan its mine workings and projected mine workings beneath the tract of land and within three hundred (300) feet of its outer boundaries. The operator may then proceed with his mining operations in the manner indicated on the copy of the map or plan; but if the conduct of his mining operations nearer than three hundred (300) feet to any surveyed natural gas or petroleum well, whether completed or being drilled, or to any proposed well where a derrick is being constructed for drilling, or proposed well will endanger the use of drilling of the well, the well owner or operator affected may, within fifteen (15) days from the receipt of the copy of the map by him and the department, file specific objections in writing to the mining operations within less than three hundred (300) feet of the well; and if the objection is filed, the department shall notify the operator of the character of the objections and fix a time and place for an informal hearing not more than ten (10) days from the end of the fifteen (15) day period. At the hearing, the operator and the well operator, in person or by a representative, shall consider the objections and agree upon the character and extent of operations to be conducted within less than three hundred (300) feet of the well to satisfy the objections raised and meet the approval of the department. And, if no agreement can be reached, the department, after an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, shall make a decision defining what coal, if any, is necessary to be left for the safe protection of the use and operation of the well. The decision shall be subject to appeal by either party as provided in KRS

351.040

. The department shall keep a complete record of all the hearings.

The mine operator shall, every six (6) months, while mining within three hundred (300) feet of the surveyed natural gas and petroleum well, bring up to date the maps and plans required by this section, or file new maps and plans complete to date.

Prior to issuance of a waiver to mine within three hundred (300) feet of an oil or gas well, the Division of Mine Safety shall determine whether the oil or gas operator has been properly notified as required by subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:

3766b-14: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 46; 1974, ch. 315, § 76; 1992, ch. 348, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 308, § 48, effective April 9, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 337, effective July 15, 1996; 2009, ch. 79, § 13, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 87, § 35, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.520.
Mine scales. [Repealed.]

352.530.
Check weighman. [Repealed.]

352.540.
Payment of miners.

All persons employing persons in mining work shall, on or before the fifteenth and thirtieth days of each month pay to each employee, within fifteen (15) days of the aforesaid fifteenth or thirtieth day, respectively, in lawful money of the United States, the full amount of wages due him, unless prevented by an unavoidable casualty. If, at any time of payment, the employee is absent from his place of labor he shall be entitled to such payment at any reasonable time thereafter on demand.

History.

2738r-1: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 49.

352.550.
Coercion of trade of miners prohibited. [Repealed]

History.

2738r-2: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 50; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

352.560.
Definition of terms used in KRS 352.560 to 352.610. [Repealed.]

352.570.
Ventilation of clay mines by fans or other approved methods required. [Repealed.]

352.580.
Withdrawal of men from mine in case of failure of ventilating devices. [Repealed.]

352.590.
Amount of ventilation — Cubic feet of air required per minute. [Repealed.]

352.600.
Men other than repair men not to work where ventilation is insufficient. [Repealed.]

352.610.
Protection of unused or abandoned sections of mine. [Repealed.]

352.620.
Provisions concerning coal mining applicable to clay mines and clay mining. [Repealed.]

352.630.
Telephone service or equivalent two-way communication facilities — Locations — Alarms.

Effective September 1, 2006, each licensed underground facility shall provide telephone service or equivalent two-way communications facilities, approved by the director or his authorized representative, between the surface of each landing of main shafts and slopes, and between the surface and each working section that is more than one hundred (100) feet from a portal. Implementation of telephone or equivalent two-way communications facilities shall be subject to the following provisions:

Telephones or equivalent two-way communications facilities provided at each working section shall be located not more than five hundred (500) feet outby the last open crosscut and not more than eight hundred (800) feet from the farthest point of penetration of the working faces on the section;

Primary telephone or two-way communications systems and lines shall be located in the intake air course or adjacent entry, but shall not be located in the beltway or return air courses unless approved by the director of the Division of Mine Safety in seams with coal heights twenty-six (26) inches or less; and

The incoming communication signal on the telephone or other approved two-way communications system shall activate an audible alarm that is distinguishable from the surrounding noise level and a visual alarm that can be seen by a miner regularly employed on the working section.

Effective September 1, 2006, each licensed underground facility shall have a telephone or equivalent two-way communications facility located on the surface within one thousand (1,000) feet of all main portals. The telephone or equivalent two-way communications system shall be installed in either a building or in a box-like structure designed to protect the communications equipment from damage by inclement weather. At least one (1) of these communications systems shall be at a location where a responsible person is available and authorized to respond to an emergency situation at all times when miners are working underground. The incoming communications signal on the telephone or other approved two-way communications system shall activate an audible alarm, distinguishable from the surrounding noise level and a visual alarm that can be seen by the responsible person stationed near the communications system.

Effective September 1, 2006, each licensed underground facility shall have a telephone or equivalent two-way communications system located on the surface which can be used to activate the licensed facilities emergency action plan required in KRS

352.640

and to comply with reporting requirements contained in KRS

352.180

. The telephone or equivalent two-way communications system shall be installed in either a building or in a box-like structure designed to protect the communications equipment from damage by inclement weather. At least one (1) of the communications systems shall be at a location where a responsible person is available and authorized to respond at all times to an emergency situation when miners are working. The incoming communications signal on the telephone or other approved two-way communications system shall activate an audible alarm, distinguishable from the surrounding noise level and a visual alarm that can be seen by the responsible person stationed near the communications facility.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 185, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 87, § 36, effective June 24, 2015.

352.640.
Emergency action plans — Components — Copies — Training — Evacuation and firefighting programs.

An emergency action plan shall be submitted with each application for a license to operate an underground mine. The emergency action plan shall be for use during emergencies at the licensed facility. The plan shall consist of the following components:

A certification, submitted by the applicant, that the telephone or equivalent two-way communications system will be in place and functioning at the facility when operation begins;

A listing of the telephone numbers of the facility personnel, state and federal regulatory agencies, and state, federal, and local emergency response agencies to be contacted in the event of a mine emergency;

The positions and telephone numbers of the persons designated by the licensee to implement the emergency action plan during mine emergencies;

The name of the ambulance service or first responder with which the licensee has made arrangements to provide twenty-four (24) hour emergency medical assistance for any person injured at the licensed facility;

A copy of the licensed facility’s mine emergency evacuation and firefighting plan, if one is required; and

A training schedule for all personnel as to their responsibilities under the emergency action plan. On site, each licensed facility shall maintain a log containing training dates, the personnel trained, and their positions and shifts.

The licensee shall provide a revised copy of the plan to the regional office and the Frankfort office of the Division of Mine Safety within ten (10) days of a change in any of the information required in subsection (1) of this section becoming effective.

The licensee shall be responsible for ensuring that copies of the licensed facility’s emergency action plan are submitted to the appropriate regional office and to the Frankfort office of the Division of Mine Safety. Copies of the plan also shall be kept on the premises of the licensed facility where it shall be made open to inspection by the licensee’s employees and their independent contractors and inspectors.

Each licensed facility shall post in a prominent place at the mine office a copy of all emergency contact numbers. The list of emergency contact numbers shall be made available to the licensee’s employees and their independent contractors during training on the emergency action plan.

Each licensed facility shall train all employees of the licensee, including their independent contractors, at the beginning of their employment with the licensed facility and on an annual basis on the emergency action plan and the persons responsible for the plan’s implementation.

Each licensed facility on which an underground mine is operated shall develop and implement a mine emergency evacuation and firefighting program that instructs all miners and other personnel of the licensed facility in the proper evacuation procedures they must follow if a mine emergency occurs. The program, and any revisions thereto, must be submitted to the director or his designee. All personnel of the licensed facility, including independent contractors, shall be trained in the performance of the plan’s revisions prior to any of the revisions being implemented. The program shall include a plan to train all miners on all shifts with procedures for:

Mine emergency evacuation for mine emergencies that present an imminent danger to miners due to fire, explosion, or gas, or water inundation;

Evacuation of all miners not required for a mine emergency response;

Rapid assembly and transportation of necessary miners, fire suppression equipment, and rescue apparatus to the scene of the mine emergency; and

Operation of fire suppression equipment available in the mine.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 185, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 87, § 37, effective June 24, 2015.

352.650.
Mine maps — Posting — Escape drills — Frequency — Locations — Information.

A map shall be posted or readily accessible to all miners in each working section, and in each area where mechanized equipment is being installed or removed. The map shall show the designated escapeways from the working section to the locations where miners must travel to satisfy the escapeway drill specified in subsection (4) of this section.

A map showing the main escapeways shall be posted at the surface location of the licensed facility where miners congregate.

All maps shall be kept up-to-date. Any changes in routes of travel, locations of doors, or directions of airflow shall be shown on the maps by the end of the shift. Miners affected by the changes shall be informed of the changes before entering the underground areas of the mine. Miners on a shift underground when any change is made shall be immediately notified of the change.

At least once every ninety (90) days, each miner, including those miners with working stations located between the working sections and main escapeways, shall participate in a practice escapeway drill.

During the drill, miners that do not have working stations located between the working sections and the main escapeways shall travel the greater distance of the two (2) following choices:

A path from the primary or alternate escapeway from the miner’s working section or from the area where mechanized mining equipment is being installed or removed, to the area where the split of air ventilating the working section intersects a main air course; or

A path which is two thousand (2,000) feet outby the section loading point.

Those miners who have working stations located between the working sections and the main escapeways shall participate in the escapeway drill by traveling in the primary or alternate escapeway for a distance of two thousand (2,000) feet from their working station toward the nearest escape facility or drift opening.

At least once every six (6) weeks and for each shift, at least two (2) miners on each coal-producing working section who work on that section, accompanied by the section foreman, shall participate in a practice escapeway drill and shall travel the primary or alternate escapeway:

From the location specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section to the surface;

To mechanical escape facilities; or

To an underground entrance to a shaft or slope to the surface.

Systematic rotation of section personnel shall be used so that all miners participate in this drill.

At least once every six (6) weeks, at least two (2) miners on each maintenance shift and a foreman or assistant foreman shall participate in a practice escapeway drill and shall travel the primary or alternate escapeway:

From the location specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section to the surface;

To mechanical escape facilities; or

To an underground entrance to a shaft or slope to the surface.

Systematic rotation of maintenance personnel and working sections shall be used so that all miners participate in the drill and so that the escapeways from all sections are traveled.

For all escapeway drills required by this section, an escapeway drill shall not be conducted in the same escapeway as the drill proceeding immediately thereafter.

Before or during practice escapeway drills, miners shall be informed of the locations of fire doors, check curtains, changes in the routes of travel, caches of self-rescuers, and plans for diverting smoke from escapeways.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 185, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

352.660.
Prohibition of termination or disciplining of miners for reporting unsafe mines or violations.

No licensee, operator, mine superintendent, mine manager, or other supervisory personnel shall terminate or otherwise discipline a miner for reporting or documenting to or cooperating with regulatory agencies in their investigation of unsafe mining practices or conditions or violations of provisions of KRS Chapter 351 or 352.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 185, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

352.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]

352.9901.
Moratorium ending April 8, 1996, on levying of mandatory fines and penalties pursuant to KRS 352.990 — Exception. [Repealed.]